Washington statutes.
RCW 19.265.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Borrower" means a taxpayer who receives the proceeds of a refund anticipation loan.

(2) "Department" means the department of financial institutions.

(3) "Director" means the director of the department of financial institutions.

(4) "Facilitator" means a person who receives or accepts for delivery an application for a refund anticipation loan, delivers a check in payment of refund anticipation loan proceeds, or in any other manner acts to allow the making of a refund anticipation loan. "Facilitator" does not include a bank, thrift, savings association, industrial bank, or credit union, operating under the laws of the United States or this state, an affiliate that is a servicer for such an entity, or any person who acts solely as an intermediary and does not deal with a taxpayer in the making of the refund anticipation loan.

(5) "Lender" means a person who extends credit to a borrower in the form of a refund anticipation loan.

(6) "Person" means an individual, a firm, a partnership, an association, a corporation, or other entity.

(7) "Refund anticipation loan" means a loan borrowed by a taxpayer from a lender based on the taxpayer's anticipated federal income tax refund.

(8) "Refund anticipation loan fee" means the charges, fees, or other consideration imposed by the lender for a refund anticipation loan. This term does not include any charge, fee, or other consideration usually imposed by the facilitator in the ordinary course of business for nonloan services, such as fees for tax return preparation and fees for electronic filing of tax returns.

(9) "Refund anticipation loan fee schedule" means a listing or table of refund anticipation loan fees charged by the facilitator or the lender for three or more representative refund anticipation loan amounts. The schedule shall list separately each fee or charge imposed, as well as a total of all fees imposed, related to the making of refund anticipation loans. The schedule shall also include, for each representative loan amount, the estimated annual percentage rate calculated under the guidelines established by the federal truth in lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.

(10) "Taxpayer" means an individual who files a federal income tax return.

[ 2005 c 471 s 2.]